Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-101
Act, how cited.

Sections 60-101 to 60-197 shall be known and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1061, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB49, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB202, § 10;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 7;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB156, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB490, § 1.